Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.14.440

Alternative direct petition method—Ordinance providing for annexation.

Following the hearing, if the legislative body determines to effect the annexation, they shall do so by ordinance. Subject to RCW 35A.14.410, the ordinance may annex all or any portion of the proposed area but may not include in the annexation any property not described in the petition. Upon passage of the annexation ordinance, a certified copy shall be filed with the board of county commissioners of the county in which the annexed property is located.

[ 2003 c 331 s 12.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—Effective date—2003 c 331: See notes following RCW 35.13.410.